District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2309

Board of Directors — Appointment; composition; terms; removal.

Repealed.

June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 265, ch. 324, § 5
July 23, 1968, 82 Stat. 397, Pub. L. 90-415, §§ 1,2
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1809.
1973 Ed., § 31-1029.